Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.280

Action on bond after refusal to pay—New bond, failure to file.

Upon the refusal of the surety company to pay the demand the director may thereupon bring an action on the bond in behalf of said consignor creditors. Upon any action being commenced on said bond the director may require the filing of a new bond and immediately upon the recovery in any action on such bond such commission merchant and/or dealer shall file a new bond and upon failure to file the same within ten days in either case such failure shall constitute grounds for the suspension or revocation of his or her license.

[ 2011 c 336 s 582; 1959 c 139 s 28.]